Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-348
Installment loan licensee; advance payments; application of payments.

Every installment loan licensee shall permit payment to be made in advance in any amount equal to one or more full installments on any loan contract at any time during regular business hours, but the licensee may apply such payment first to all accrued charges in full up to the date of such payment.

Laws 1965, c. 268, § 15, p. 765;

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 48;

Laws 2009, LB327, § 18;

Laws 2012, LB965, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB778, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB355, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 69.